Title
Review for Pay It Forward (2000)
Number of Reviews
19

Author
Robin Clifford
"Think of an idea to change our world - and put it into action" - that is the
first assignment posed by Eugene Simonet (Kevin Spacey) to his new seventh grade
social studies class. One young boy, Trevor McKinney (Haley Joel Osment), takes
the assignment to heart and begins a cycle of good deeds that may really change
the world in "Pay It Forward."
Pay it forward. What is it? If someone does you a decent turn, don't repay it,
pay it forward. Do something good for three other people. Then, if they do three
good turns and so on and so on. Before you know it, the world is a better place
for everyone.
Trevor begins his own campaign to "pay it forward" when he befriends a homeless
junkie named Jerry (James Caviezal) and brings him home, much to the chagrin and
fright of Arlene McKinney (Helen Hunt), Trevor's mom. Arlene, a cocktail
waitress in Las Vegas, is a single mom fighting her own demon - alcohol. She was
married to an abusive drunkard (Jon Bon Jovi) who beat her regularly before she
split for Vegas with Trevor.
When her son's attempt to save Jerry fails, the boy selects his teacher, the
fire-scarred Mr. Simonet, as his next pay it forward target. The lonely Eugene
is drawn to the troubled, pretty Arlene and the couple begins to form an
emotional bond when her ex suddenly shows up - triggering one of Trevor's
greatest fears. The chivalrous Eugene bows out of his  budding relationship with
Arlene without a word, leaving Trevor with another failed attempt to pay it
forward. The boy's last effort, to help a meek kid at school stave off bullies,
ends up being the one action that does, in fact, make the world a better place,
even if the cost is fatally high.
Concurrent with this tale about Trevor is the search, by reporter Chris Chandler
(Jay Mohr), to find the source of the idea of paying it forward. While trying to
get a scoop on a hostage story, Chris's vintage Ford Mustang is wrecked by the
fleeing perpetrator. A stranger who happens by hands the puzzled reporter the
keys to a brand new Jaguar and leaves with just the words that he'll be in
touch. When they get together later, the man tells Chris the true story of a
street hood who did him a kindness, in a hospital emergency room, that helped
his daughter, maybe saving her life. The gangster's word to the man, instead of
accepting thanks, is to just pay the favor forward. Now, Chris is required to
fulfill his own pay it forward obligation and becomes obsessed with finding the
source of this remarkable philosophy. His search is the twine that binds his
quest to Trevor's own story.
Director Mimi Leder takes a turn from her first, action feature entries, "The
Peacemaker" and "Deep Impact," with the much more character driven material of
Leslie Dixon's ("The Thomas Crown Affair" remake) original screenplay. The
helmer benefits from the acting talents of the key players and is able to give
some life to the preachy script. The idea of "pay it forward" is repeated so
many times in the course of the film, even an extraordinarily obtuse person
would get the point. The fairly economical film tries to cover too much
territory as it delves into Trevor's attempts to save the world, the multiple
relations of those around the boy, and the reporter's quest for the truth. It's
a bit too ambitious a job and may have been better handled by a director with
more experience dealing with character, rather than plot. Certainly a tighter
screenplay would have befitted the efforts of the cast and crew.
The talented cast is led by two Oscar winners and one nominee, with Spacey, Hunt
and Osment playing the challenged protagonists of the tale. All three show they
deserve the acclaim gained in their recent efforts, though Spacey has proven his
greatness as a superb character actor many times before. Made up as a burn
victim of many years before, Spacey bears the heavy, uglifying makeup with
dignity, showing Eugene as a complex, mostly dour character who has an inherent
kindness that just wants to pop out and let him love Arlene and Trevor as his
own family. When he is rejected, by his own sense of honor, your heart goes out
to the man. Spacey makes you want Eugene to be happy.
Haley Joel Osment proves that he is not a one shot wonder for his perf in "The
Sixth Sense" (although I am glad to say I noted the kid in the otherwise mundane
1996 Whoopi Goldberg/Gerard Depardieu comedy "Bogus"). In his portrayal of the
right-minded Trevor the inherent intelligence and dedication of the boy is a
significant force in the development of the story and Osment meets the need with
a professionalism that belies his years.
Helen Hunt does fine as the put upon, alcoholic Arlene who doesn't see that
Eugene is true salvation when her handsome, apologetic (and declared sober) ex
returns. Unfortunately, Hunt developed her character as too sympathetic toward
Eugene, so her sudden acceptance of the old ways doesn't play true. Especially
since she doesn't consult Trevor, who is profoundly impacted by her decision.
Unfortunately for Hunt, her character, Arlene, is not much different from her
previous, Oscar-garnering perf in "As Good As It Gets." She's a working class,
single Mom, struggling with adversity (ill kid versus alcohol) and meeting Mr.
Right.
Jay Mohr does yeoman work as the smart-ass reporter digging for the story. Jim
Caviezel isn't given much time as the recipient of Trevor's pay it forward, but
his story gets a nice little coda of redemption when he save a young lady from
self destruction. Angie Dickinson (unrecognized to me, though not others) plays
Trevor's homeless - by choice - grandmother who has a late-breaking influence on
things.
Techs are solid throughout. It's not the acting or the behind-the-camera work
that is the problem. Dixon's overly ambition screenplay tries to cover too much
ground in the allotted time and harps on its theme of "pay it forward." I got
the idea early on, so the subsequent 20 or 30 references fell on deaf ears.
"Pay It Forward" is an odd mix of good acting talent and an under-achieving
script that hampers the overall effort. Leder makes the transition from action
to character study with more than a few bumps, but practice will make perfect, I
suppose. With the credentials of the talent involved in this effort, I would
have expected more, much more. I give it a C+.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Author
Shannon Patrick Sullivan
Directed by Mimi Leder. Screenplay by Leslie Dixon, based on the novel by
Catherine Ryan Hyde. Starring Haley Joel Osment, Helen Hunt, Kevin Spacey.
Running time: 124 minutes. Rated AA by the MFCB. Reviewed on November
18th, 2000.
There are some nice ideas in "Pay It Forward". One of them is the central
premise itself -- that one person does "three big favours for three other
people", and then those people do three more favours for three more
people, and on and on. Better still, these have to be favours that the
other people "can't do for themselves" -- certainly not a minor 
proposition!
Admittedly, it's not a terribly realistic concept. I think that in real
life, far too many people would take advantage of the first part without
doing the second (or is that just my own cynicism peeking through?). But
in a cinematic context, there is nothing wrong with this per se, and
indeed the "pay it forward" philosophy has all the makings of a juicy
movie premise.
Unfortunately, the Mimi Leder picture just does not have enough faith in
its central idea. Instead of taking the ball and running with it, "pay it
forward" is used as a clothesline on which to hang a number of far less
rivetting, less original subplots. Despite its title, this is not a movie
about a philanthropic way of life, but instead concerns itself mostly the
broken people who become involved in that lifestyle.
And make no mistake, "Pay It Forward" is a film almost entirely populated
with broken people -- those suffering from abuse, alcoholism, drug
addictions, or simply neglect. Some have suggested the movie is
"Capra-esque", but it is Capra viewed through distinctly 21st-century
misanthropy. Those expecting a latter-day "It's A Wonderful Life" are
likely to be disappointed.
Middle schooler Trevor McKinney (Haley Joel Osment) is a latchkey kid
whose alcoholic father is long gone. Mother Arlene (Helen Hunt) works two
jobs and is so close to falling off the wagon that she must be scraping
pavement. Trevor's new social studies teacher is Eugene Simonet (Kevin
Spacey), a man who is himself scarred both physically and emotionally. But
Eugene is a good teacher, and on the first day of school, he challenges
his class to come up with "an idea that will change the world -- and put
it into action".
So quickly that you'd swear he must have been expecting the question,
Trevor devises the "pay it forward" philosophy. His first act is to let a
homeless man (James Caviezel) live in his garage. Then he tries to hook up
Arlene and Eugene, neither of whom have been able to cultivate a
functional love life. And for his third "big favour", he goes to the aid
of a classmate perpetually troubled by bullies.
None of these work out quite like Trevor had hoped. And yet, the script by
Leslie Dixon assures us that something good will come of it, because we
are privy to glimpses of four months in the future, when a reporter (Jay
Mohr) becomes part of "pay it forward" and begins backtracking through the
chain to find its originator.
Unfortunately, each of Trevor's "favours" are used not so much to propel
the "pay it forward" story forward, but rather as springboards, to a
greater or lesser extent, for subplots of inferior dramatic value. It is
these which dominate the movie. The most significant is the relationship
between Arlene and Eugene. Disappointingly, especially given two such
unusual characters and two such talented actors, this is nothing more than
a standard romantic storyline. It goes through so many timeworn stages of
misunderstanding, revelation, complication, separation, and reconciliation
that it could have been lifted directly from a screenwriter's how-to book.
If nothing else, these sequences do at least boast the acting skills of
Hunt and Spacey, who are in their usual fine form. That Hunt is able to
portray Arlene as such a complex, troubled individual without engendering
feelings of pity (or, for that matter, disgust) is somewhat remarkable.
Hunt doesn't forget that, while Arlene is burdened by a tremendous number
of issues, there is more to the character than just those issues. This is
best illustrated in a terrific scene with Angie Dickinson (playing a bag
lady), one of "Pay It Forward"'s few genuinely touching moments. 
Spacey, meanwhile, does an excellent job of alluding to the hidden depths
in Eugene's psyche without overplaying it. Consider the sequence in which
Eugene finally reveals the root of his problems. As scripted, it is
typical melodramatic fare, but Spacey never loses his center and plays the
scene sincerely, without caving into the overt sentimentality of the
moment, giving it some measure of credibility. Spacey also enjoys an
excellent on-screen rapport with Osment, who continues to demonstrate that
he is one of those rare child stars who actually knows how to act, rather
than just mug for the camera.
The other subplots are not so blessed, unfortunately. The chronicle of
Caviezel's hobo comes across as particularly disjointed, as the script
drops in on it only at emotional highpoints (or lowpoints, as the case may
be). It feels like we're just seeing the trailer for a more detailed
storyline.
The school bully arc, meanwhile, is plainly included only to provide "Pay
It Forward" with a convenient conclusion. This would not be so bad if that
ending were more meaningful, but as it stands, it constitutes nothing more
than indisputable viewer manipulation on the part of the screenwriters. I
will not divulge any details, except to say that rarely have I watched a
scene so clearly intended merely to provoke an obvious response from the
audience, without any thought given to how this might impact on the 
movie's overall theme.
As a result, "Pay It Forward" comes across as something of an oddity -- a
movie which not only shunts its own premise into the background for long
stretches of time, but indeed provides its own evidence to discredit that
premise. A few good performances do not come close enough to saving this
poorly-conceived film. "Pay It Forward" has the makings of something good,
but in the end it is much like the characters which inhabit it: broken.
Copyright Š 2000 Shannon Patrick Sullivan.
Archived at The Popcorn Gallery,
  http://www.physics.mun.ca/~sps/movies/PayItForward.html
  _______________________________________________________________________
 / Shannon Patrick Sullivan  | "We are all in the gutter, but some of us \
|       shannon@mun.ca       |  are looking at the stars." - Oscar Wilde |
 \___________________________|__________________________________________/
  | Popcorn Gallery Movie Reviews    www.physics.mun.ca/~sps/movies.html | 
  | Doctor Who: A Brief History of Time (Travel)            /drwho.html  |

Author
Berge Garabedian
For more reviews and movie wallpapers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
What would you expect if you put together a cast featuring an Oscar-winning
actor in Kevin Spacey, an Oscar-winning actress in Helen Hunt, an
Oscar-nominated actor in little Haley Joel Osment and an Oscar-nominated
Musical Score guy in Thomas Newman (AMERICAN BEAUTY)? An Oscar winning movie
perhaps? Well, things don't always turn out the way we want them to, right?
PLOT:
A young boy is challenged to make the world a better place by his teacher
and comes up with a revolutionary idea about helping those who can't help
themselves. If you become a recipient of said good deed from another, you
must in turn, perform an exemplary favor for three other people, and so on,
and so forth. It isn't long before the young boy draws his teacher and
mother into the world of "paying it forward".
CRITIQUE:
Great concept, top-notch acting and a nice try but this film ultimately
fails because it tags convenient situations on to its second half and gives
us one of the most uninspiring endings that I have seen in years! Don't they
have test audiences for stuff like this? Why anyone would think that this
finale "completes" this picture in any way is beyond me! But enough about
the crappy ending. On the whole, the film was actually working for me until
about the halfway point. That's when things started to get a little sloppy
with various clichéd/unbelievable character moments. One character
conveniently relating an exact replica story of his past to identify with a
problem situation of the present...a little farfetched. Another completely
artificial and one-dimensional character showing up for only one
purpose...because the script needed someone to show up and mess things up at
that point. And yet another character conveniently becoming a relation to
someone else in the film because it served the script, and nothing else (is
this a soap opera?). All very convenient circumstances which might've been
interesting if they had been made believable. Unfortunately for me, they all
rang false and those three phony moments combined to draw me away from any
attachment that I had developed with the lead characters to that point. Of
course, the film's horrible conclusion also helped solidify my
disappointment in a story which seemed to be aiming for so much, while
ultimately bullseying so little.
The movie also ran on for too long with not enough time spent on the most
interesting aspect of the film...duh, the whole concept of "pay it forward"!
The idea itself was captivating, but just seemed to become more of a
backdrop to the sentimental festivities in the foreground as the movie moved
onwards. I really loved the "pay it forward" moments between people and
would've liked to have seen more of them in the film, perhaps even developed
further. And it's all really too bad because the talent assembled here is as
good as they come. Spacey delivers, as does Hunt, while Osment proves to
everyone that THE SIXTH SENSE was no fluke. But the script, boy-oh-boy, what
the heck happened to the script? It felt like someone else came in about
halfway and reduced it down to this melodramatic slosh pile of faux
circumstances. And even though I was getting a certain "message" from the
film as it progressed (the world can be a better place), the ending just
seemed to flush any enthusiasm that I had for that concept out of me. Also,
the score was way too similar to the one in AMERICAN BEAUTY. C'mon folks,
try a little harder next time, will ya? All in all, a misfire, a decent
attempt at reaching for that higher goal but coming up short. Catch it on
video for the strong performances and try to figure out yourself when
exactly things started going wrong in this film. And yes, you can "pay this"
review forward on to three other people if you like...in fact, please do.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Actor Gary Werntz, the attorney who is one of the first people in the film
to "pay it forward", is in real life, director Mimi Leder's husband.
Not to my surprise, the man who scored the music for this film is also the
same man who scored the music for the Oscar-winning picture AMERICAN BEAUTY.

Author
Dustin Putman
Directed by Mimi Leder.
Cast: Kevin Spacey, Helen Hunt, Haley Joel Osment, Jay Mohr, James Caviezel, 
Angie Dickinson, Kathleen Wilhoite, Jon Bon Jovi.
2000 - 122 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for profanity, violence, and sexual situations).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, October 21, 2000.
It is common nature to eventually repay someone who does a good deed for you. 
But what if, in a perfect world, that very act of kindness led you to, 
instead, pay that very good will to three other people, under the condition 
that they will do the same for three more? Idealistic? Yes. But that is the 
key notion present in "Pay It Forward," a brilliantly acted, but dramatically 
inaccurate drama, saccharinely directed by Mimi Leder (1998's "Deep Impact"). 
There is rarely a kind of film more disappointing than those that strive for 
excellence, and have what it takes to be successful, but come up far short, 
misplacing emotional honesty with audience manipulation. For every moment of 
true poignance and effectiveness, there are three that ring with a resounding 
falseness that stops the whole picture in its tracks.
It is the first day of the seventh grade, and intelligent latchkey kid Trevor 
(Haley Joel Osment) is intrigued when his hard-edged, but caring, social 
studies teacher Eugene Simonet (Kevin Spacey), whose severe scars on his face 
mask his fear of ever getting close with anyone, presents the class with an 
extra credit assignment--find a way to change the world, and put that idea 
into play. Whereas the rest of his classmates choose to begin recycling and 
picking up trash alongside the road, Trevor takes the assignment very 
seriously, devising the idea of paying it forward, in which you do something 
important to change someone's life with the understanding that they will do 
the same for three other people, and those three do the same for three more, 
and so on.
Trevor's first act of kindness is taking a heroin-addicted homeless man 
(James Caviezel) off the streets and giving him shelter in his garage, 
unbeknownst to his working-class mother, Arlene (Helen Hunt), who rarely gets 
to see Trevor, as she works two jobs (one at a Las Vegas casino, and the 
other as a waitress) and drinks herself to sleep every night. Arlene loves 
Trevor unconditionally, but he holds her in contempt for her dishonesty about 
her alcoholism. With the fear that his no-good, abusive father (Jon Bon Jovi) 
will eventually come crawling back to her, Trevor next decides to set Arlene 
and Mr. Simonet up, in hopes that both of their inner pain and suffering will 
make them a perfect match for each other.
Meanwhile, set four months later, Los Angeles news reporter Chris Chandler 
(Jay Mohr) gets his car totaled, only to have a kindly man give him a new 
Jaguar, no strings attached. This unbelievable financial sacrifice leads 
Chris to discover the Pay It Forward Movement, which he eventually tracks all 
the way to Las Vegas, where Trevor resides and has no idea his idea has 
spread across the country.
Based on the popular novel by Catherine Ryan Hyde, "Pay It Forward" 
intermittently succeeds solely due to the powerhouse performances from the 
three leads. After all, they get no help from the uneven screenplay, by 
Leslie Dixon, which is unconvincing in its romance between Arlene and Eugene, 
a subplot that gradually becomes the center of the movie. Had the emotionally 
wounded Arlene and Eugene struck up a friendship and, together, helped each 
other to come to terms with the problems and mistakes that they had made in 
their lives, the film would have been infinitely more effective than the 
melodramatic, totally unnecessary romance that comes to the forefront.
Kevin Spacey (1999's "American Beauty") and Helen Hunt (2000's "Dr. T and the 
Women") are well-cast as the conflicted Eugene Simonet and the struggling 
Arlene, respectively. Both actors are at the top of their games here, with 
Spacey always lending an assured, realistic presence to his roles, and Hunt 
never being better. Hunt, especially, has gone all out to present us with a 
decidedly unattractive portrayal of a woman who is torn between the love for 
her child and the addiction to alcohol that she can't seem to kick. Never 
once afraid to look physically worn-out and wretched, Hunt gives a brave and 
touching performance, one of the very best of the year.
In his first cinematic venture since his Oscar-nominated turn in 1999's "The 
Sixth Sense," 12-year-old Haley Joel Osment is nearly flawless. Unlike the 
vast majority of child actors, who are too precocious for their own good, and 
whom you can always catch acting for the camera, Osment delivers such 
unaffected work that he even puts to shame many A-list adult actors. "The 
Sixth Sense" wasn't at all a fluke; Osment is the real deal.
The supporting players run the gamut from emphatic to misguided. Angie 
Dickinson (2000's "Duets") is a standout as Arlene's mother, a bag lady who 
is surprisingly satisfied with where her life is at, or just comes off that 
way to hide her pain and regret as both a mother and a person. Jay Mohr 
(1999's "Go") can be a fine actor, but his role of reporter Chris Chandler, 
who tracks down the source of the Pay It Forward Movement, is utterly 
superfluous, and every time his scenes show up, you can't help but think how 
this whole subplot slows the main story down, and could have been edited 
completely from the movie without making the slightest bit of difference. 
Finally, James Caviezel (2000's "Frequency") does what he can with his few 
scenes, while Jon Bon Jovi (1998's "No Looking Back") appears in little more 
than a cameo.
The concept of paying it forward is surely a fresh one, and although it 
probably would never work in the real world, the movie remains hopeful and 
strong-spirited. What is so disheartening, then, is that its reliance on plot 
contrivances keep weighing down all that is good about the film. 
Additionally, the downbeat ending is nearly unforgivable, (minor spoiler ahead
) sparing one of the characters' lives for the sole purpose of getting the 
audience to grow weepy. Had the death been the least bit respectably or 
realistically done, then it might have been all right, but the approach that 
is taken comes off feeling like a thoroughly artificial twist. It puts the 
final nail in the coffin of "Pay It Forward," an already-flawed motion 
picture that could have added up to so much more than it ultimately does.

Author
Jerry Saravia
You have heard the concept before. You receive an e-mail or a letter in the mail
regarding a great new opportunity - you send one dollar to seven addresses and
they will send one dollar to seven others, and so on. Before you know it, you
will make thousands of dollars a month. The idea forms a chain or a pyramid
strategy, hence, chain letters. The reason the idea does not work is because it
feels like a rip-off, plus whose to say that people will follow through and pay
it forward. The film "Pay it Forward" wants us to believe that people repaying
acts of kindness for kindness done upon them can work if a kid makes them
believe in the idea. But how many people are genuinely kind enough to follow
through with such a plan? Do we want to be forced to act kindly? 
Consider the opening sequence of the film set in an elementary school. Trevor
McKinney (Haley Joel Osment), a seventh grader, listens attentively in class as
his social-studies teacher, Mr. Simonet (Kevin Spacey), gives an extra-credit
assignment for the semester. The class is to come up with a plan of action to
make the world a better place and follow through by performing said action.
Trevor devises an original plan: one person does an act of kindness for someone
and that person will pay it forward by helping three other people. A chain
reaction is expected as numbers will grow and before you know it, the world will
be at peace again. But there are flaws with such a plan, aren't there? Could
such a chain reaction occur with no money involved? There may be benefits if the
acts are reciprocated but what if they aren't? This movie never dares to
consider that certain people do not want to be helped or even want to act
kindly. 
For example, there is the homeless drug addict, Jerry (Jim Caviezel), who is
taken home by Trevor. We sense that Jerry is only interested in his next fix,
which he is, but he also claims that this kid has helped him to see the light
and get another chance at life. There is the homeless alcoholic (Angie
Dickinson), her own alcoholic daughter, Arlene, Trevor's mother (Helen Hunt),
who always keep a bottle stashed in her washer. There is also another drug
addict and a couple of school bullies. And then there is Mr. Simonet, who has
burn scars all over his body, uses "a lot of big words" and whom Trevor tries to
fix up with his mother, Arlene. Trevor hopes to at least help his mother and Mr.
Simonet, as well as his friend who is beaten up by bullies. He is trying to pay
it forward. Suddenly, a movement is born, or so it seems. 
"Pay it Forward's" structure is all over the place, as it jumps backwards and
forwards in time. We see a reporter (Jay Mohr) at a crime scene where his car is
nearly demolished. A lawyer sees him, and offers his Jaguar as compensation for
the reporter's loss. The lawyer is paying it forward, and thus begins the
reporter's quest to discover the origins of this movement. "Four Months Earlier"
is the title reminding us of where we are in time yet throughout the film, Jay
Mohr's character seems to occupy the same timeline as Trevor's, particularly
during the genesis of his plan. 
Time shifting is not this film's problem. A bigger flaw is the lack of time
spent on this ingenious plan, its pros and cons and so on. Too much time is
devoted to the silly romance between Mr. Simonet and Trevor's mother to the
point of nausea. Helen Hunt is astoundingly good as the trashy waitress but her
alcoholic mood swings seem too abrupt to really believe, or as abrupt as it
should be. She undergoes such a quick recovery that it hardly seems plausible
she was ever an alcoholic to begin with. Kevin Spacey is adequately restrained
as the scarred Mr. Simonet, and has all the best dialogue scenes. But hardly
much of this matters as much as Trevor's plan of action. We see samples of it
but not enough is balanced with the film's increasingly tepid romance, not to
mention the inclusion of Trevor's own father (Jon Bon Jovi) who appears and
disappears so fast that you'll forget he ever existed. I would also have liked
to have seen more of Dickinson's character or even Caviezel's.
Some have called "Pay it Forward" shamelessly manipulative and overly
sentimental. Some have called it touching. I just found the Spacey and Hunt
characters real and engaging yet they are mostly saddled with unrealistic
dialogue and shameless cliches, and the rest of the characters are mere
stereotypes. The film is strangely watchable but also devoid of real human
emotion, and plus there is a tragic, unbelievable coda that negates most of the
film's two hour running time. All in all, not terrible but too thin and
cliche-ridden to recommend to anyone, let alone three people. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/JATMindex.shtml
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at Faust668@aol.com
or at faustus_08520@yahoo.com

Author
Harvey S. Karten
 Reviewed by Harvey Karten
 Warner Bros./Bel-Air Entertainment
 Director: Mimi Leder 
 Writer:  Leslie Dixon, novel by Catherine Ryan Hyde
 Cast: Kevin Spacey, Joel Haley Osment, Helen Hunt, Jay
Mohr, James Caviezel, John Bon Jovi, Angie Dickinson
   "Meet the Parents" is a perfect title, an ideal label for a
movie that is about just that.  By contrast, the awkward "Pay
It Forward" is an expression so stilted, so convoluted that the
characters in Mimi Leder's movie get to repeat the phrase a
dozen times or so to make sure that every last audience
member understands the connotation, which is: When a
character does you a good turn, don't pay the favor back.  
Instead pay it forward by doing a kindness for three other people.  
Be sure you tell each of the three other people to do
something for three more.  Pretty soon, following a geometric
progression, the whole world becomes a better place.  
   Sounds good, but just how do we interpret "do something
for someone else?"  If you give up your seat in the subway
car to an elderly person, you're doing good, and if that
person who just assumed your seat says a really pleasant
"good morning" to a neighbor, she's doing something good. 
The problem is that just about everyone does something that
benefits another person every day, and yet the world is not
the utopia that its originator promised.
   What started this idea? None other than a middle-school
social studies teacher in the Las Vegas suburbs, the lonely,
quiet, and unassuming Eugene Simonet (Kevin Spacey), who
springs to life only when he's in front of a stack of eleven-
year olds.  Delivering an introductory lesson on the opening
day of school--without even bothering to take attendance or
distribute textbooks--he flips up a map of the U.S. and
demonstrates with stick figures how his pay-it-forward
concept works.  When a particularly attentive lad, Trevor
McKinney (Haley Joel Osment), challenges the instructor by
asking what he ever did to help change the world, Simonet is
caught off guard.  Couldn't he just say that by teaching 100
kids every day he is doing far more than most others to help
complete strangers rather than paying back his mom and
others who served him in the past?  
   As Leder begins her film, based on Leslie Dixon's
adaptation of Catherine Ryan Hyde's novel, she takes a page
or two out of just about any movie about kids in schools
making "Pay It Forward" a "Ferris Bueller's Day Off" without
the laughs or "If" without the fiery rebellion.  More eager to
please the three-hanky crowd than to evoke laughs or create
something of quality, Leder turns the story into a do-good
soap with conventional cinematography--which means that
though she may be justified in infusing more melodrama than
you'd find in a humdrum day, she would do well at least to
keep her characters believable.  This is the hardly the case.  
   In one circumstance, for example, Trevor, taking the
teacher's opening day assignment seriously, discovers a
group of drug-addicted losers during one of his furious bike
rides. Without knowing a thing about them, he invites Jerry
the junkie (James Caviezal) to his home without his mother's
permission, feeds him, and allows his mom to risk a heart
attack upon discovering this disheveled stranger in their
home.  Jerry, not knowing the social studies teacher's rules,
fixes the family truck, thereby paying it back instead of
forward.
   The principal goal of the gifted eleven-year-old is to fix her
mother up with his favorite teacher, since the boy's own
drunken father had abandoned the family months before. 
(Isn't that paying back his teacher and his mother for the
good they did to him rather than paying it forward?  But never
mind.)  Extra suds notwithstanding, the boy's mother, Arlene
(Helen Hunt), is an alcoholic who is warned to stay away
from booze: to avoid men for at least a year lest she be put
into an atmosphere where others are drinking.  This does not
stop her from being a cocktail waitress in Vegas club.  In a
subplot that seems to come from another movie rather than
meshing successfully into this one, reporter Chris Chandler
(Jay Mohr) is given a free Jaguar by a complete stranger
after his own Mustang is totaled, and suspecting that the
donor is in a cult, he tracks down the story--one which
involves a favor done to the sports-car enthusiast by a
common hoodlum that may have saved his daughter's life,
and so the executive is paying the favor forward.  (Wouldn't
the suit be doing more for society if he sold that Jag and
donated the money to a needy person rather than to a
middle-class journalist?)
   What a humiliation for Kevin Spacey to emerge from
superior films like "American Beauty" and "The Big Kahuna,"
lowering himself by accepting a script that requires him to
act the part of a burn victim who in one climactic scene
that you've seen dozens of times before relates the story of
his childhood abuse.  Helen Hunt is made up to look so
haggard that you wonder if the cosmetician ever heard the
expression "less is more."  And James Caviezel: how can you
go from a strong, genuinely emotional piece of work as Frank
Sullivan's son, John, in "Frequency" to accept the role of a
saintly bum who not only repairs a long dormant truck but
even saves a woman from jumping off a bridge?  The only
pleasure in this film is the work of Haley Joel Osment, the
sort of kid any teacher would want in his classes, one who
uses his ingenuity to design a plan to capture a stepfather for
himself.
   This movie is sappy, unbelievable, and utterly
conventional in design.  There now.  I've done you a favor.
Pay It Forward.  Better still, pay it back.
Rated PG-13.  Running time: 109 minutes.  (C) 2000 by
Harvey Karten, film_critic@compuserve.com

Author
Laura Clifford
Mr. Simonet (Kevin Spacey) makes a big impression on his social studies
class because of his badly burned face.  His assignment, which
will cover the entire school year, quickly takes their minds, and particularly
the mind of Trevor (Haley Joel Osment, "The Sixth Sense"), the sensitive
son of a single alcoholic mom (Helen Hunt), off his appearance.  Mr.
Simonet challenges his seventh grade students to change the world.
Director Mimi Leder ("Deep Impact") needed to walk a fine line to keep
"Pay It Forward" from playing like schmaltz.  She mostly succeeds, except
for an unfortunate and cliched choice made in the film's final minutes.
Trevor take his assignment gravely and comes up with the 'pay it forward'
concept - do something really big that will help one person and that person
should repay the favor by doing something for three people.  Trevor begins
by bringing a homeless drug addict (Jim Caviezel, "The Thin Red Line") home
for food, a place to stay and a shower.  Mom's not thrilled when she awakens
from a drunken stupor to find a stranger in her garage, but eventually comes
around to Trevor's way of thinking when Jerry turns out to be a worthy cause.
Trevor's next project is his mom, who he attempts to hook up romantically with
his teacher.  Mr. Simonet doesn't drink and Trevor reasons that a
new man will make mom strong when his shiftless alcoholic dad (Jon Bon Jovi)
next comes a'calling.  His final project, keeping schoolmate Adam from
being beaten up by bullies, plays like a bit of an afterthought.
While these peoples' lives are unfolding in Las Vegas, a second story proceeds 
in reverse order, beginning in LA.  Jay Mohr ("Jerry Maguire") is a reporter 
who is given a new Jaguar by a lawyer when his own car is totalled at a crime 
scene.  The cynical journalist wrests the 'pay it forward' story out of his 
benefactor and begins to trace it back, determined to find the root.
Osment once again proves his acting ability as the seriously determined Trevor.
He seems wise beyond his eleven years, yet can still cut loose and act his
age.  Spacey stretches as the somewhat square teacher who finds himself 
attracted to a woman of a far different economical and educational background.  
He carries himself stiffly, befitting both his emotional wariness and his 
physical condition.  Hunt, looking leathery and overly made up, is his opposite.
She's all breathy and sloppily emotional.  This is a far different single-mom-
of-troubled-son-with-unusual-male-suitor than she played in "As Good As It
Gets," although I'm willing to bet she gets criticized for replaying that role.
Caviezel is a convincing addict, trying and failing to get straight.  
Mohr applies that slightly slimy quality that served him well in "Maguire."  
Angie Dickinson is surprisingly effective as a homeless drunk who lives in her 
car.  Bon Jovi doesn't get a lot of screen time and is merely the stock 
'wrong guy.'
I haven't read the book by Catherine Ryan Hyde so am unsure if screenwriter
Leslie Dixon ("The Thomas Crown Affair") deserves the blame for the three
hanky ending which doesn't serve the film well.  She does work the two reverse 
timelines deftly and the dialogue mostly sounds natural.  Hunt and Spacey have 
an extraordinary exchange when Arlene finally admits why Trevor's troubled - 
'My friends are all drunks and so am I.'  'I believe some people refer to that 
as being in recovery,' responds Simonet.  The two also have an awkward, actory 
dialogue when Simonet reveals how he was burned.  These two scenes exhibit the 
good writing (and ideas) versus the cliched, and the actors can't quite 
overcome the latter.
Cinematographer Oliver Stapelton, who did beautiful work in "The Cider House 
Rules," is a bit more pedestrian here, although he does capture multiple faces 
of Las Vegas, from the glitzy strip to the unfashionable homes of its working 
class to the majestic mountains seen outside Simonet's classroom windows.  The 
chiming bells score is strongly reminiscent of "American Beauty," perhaps to 
recall Spacey's most recent Oscar win with Academy members.  The use of Jane 
Siberry's "Calling All Angels" at the film's finale drives home with soppy 
symbolism the sentimentality so deftly avoided through most of the film's 
running time.
Mimi Leder is heading in the right direction with her third film, although
more emotional restraint (and another ending!) would have served her better.  
"Pay It Forward," though, is sure to be a crowd pleaser.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Author
Homer Yen
In "Pay It Forward" (based on Catherine Ryan Hyde's
recent book), a melodrama brimming with cynicism, we
see that bad things happen to good people.  What's
worse, the more good you do, the more you'll get
punished for it.  
Victimized most by this odd paradox is 7th grader
Trevor (Haley Joel Osment).  He performs these
magnanimous acts of kindness because his erudite
Social Studies teacher, Mr. Simonet (Kevin Spacey),
has challenged the classroom with an extra credit
assignment: "come up with an idea to change our world
and put it into action."  The unusually benevolent
Trevor comes up with a pyramid-like scheme of
'pay-it-forward' where he'll perform an act of
kindness for three strangers, and they, in turn, must
do the same.  But in a cynical world where strangers
are more likely to be considered enemies rather than
friends, charity is looked upon with suspicion.  Even
worse, kindness may yield cruel consequences. 
Appropriately set in Las Vegas, where losers outnumber
winners 20-to-1.  "Pay It Forward" makes it clear that
the world is full of problems, from wife battering to
drug addiction to a wanton need for violence.  Yet,
amid this chaos, there are glimmers of hope that shine
through.  This beacon of optimism centers on Trevor
and his 'pay it forward' idea.  For example, he
invites a homeless man (James Caviezel) to come over
and sleep in the garage.  He also hopes to save his
friend from a brutal beating by a group of bullies. 
Each provides a valuable lesson, challenging us to
overcome our suspicion towards others and to risk
leaving our comfort zone.
Trevor also tries to make a love match for his mom
(Helen Hunt) and Mr. Simonet.  Most of the film
centers on this plot component.  His mom is an
irresponsible parent who frequently drinks herself to
sleep after pulling double-shifts as a waitress at a
strip club.  Meanwhile, Mr. Simonet suffers from a
scarred psyche that confines him to the prosaic life
he now leads.  The two are given a chance to explore
their pasts, their hopes, and to come to terms with
their personal struggles.  But their story seems
familiar and only partially engaging.  Of course, it's
a pleasure to watch Hunt and Spacey perform.  She
gives a gritty and strong performance as the alcoholic
mom.  Spacey is adept at portraying the vulnerable and
wounded man.  And Osment shows us that his
Oscar-nominated turn in the "Sixth Sense" was no
fluke.  
But their performances could not hide the film's
shortcomings.  It's stylistically bland and the
screenplay is weak.  The story lingers much too long
on the Mom/Mr. Simonet element, creating an odd sense
of imbalance.  With so much of the film focused on
this, its original premise becomes supplanted by a
love story.   It also teases the audience with an idea
that it wants to like, but then gets mired in a tone
that's continually dispirited and even weepy.  The
message contained within is that the world is a ball
of blighted hope.  For Trevor, a mere 12-year old, a
small beacon can get easily snuffed out when there is
so much to filter through.   Consequently, the film
tempers its feel-good tone with rejection, sorrow, and
defeat.  The ending is shamelessly treacly, and
whether you'll accept that payoff depends on your
tolerance for "Patch Adams."  Ultimately, this film
presents noble thoughts, but doesn't fulfill its
promise.

Author
Faust667@aol.com
You have heard the concept before. You receive an e-mail or a letter
in the mail regarding a great new opportunity - you send one dollar to
seven addresses and they will send one dollar to seven others, and so
on. Before you know it, you will make thousands of dollars a
month. The idea forms a chain or a pyramid strategy, hence, chain
letters. The reason the idea does not work is because it feels like a
rip-off, plus whose to say that people will follow through and pay it
forward. The film "Pay it Forward" wants us to believe that people
repaying acts of kindness for kindness done upon them can work if a
kid makes them believe in the idea. But how many people are genuinely
kind enough to follow through with such a plan? Do we want to be
forced to act kindly?
Consider the opening sequence of the film set in an elementary
school. Trevor McKinney (Haley Joel Osment), a seventh grader, listens
attentively in class as his social-studies teacher, Mr. Simonet (Kevin
Spacey), gives an extra-credit assignment for the semester. The class
is to come up with a plan of action to make the world a better place
and follow through by performing said action. Trevor devises an
original plan: one person does an act of kindness for someone and that
person will pay it forward by helping three other people. A chain
reaction is expected as numbers will grow and before you know it, the
world will be at peace again. But there are flaws with such a plan,
aren't there? Could such a chain reaction occur with no money
involved? There may be benefits if the acts are reciprocated but what
if they aren't? This movie never dares to consider that certain people
do not want to be helped or even want to act kindly.
For example, there is the homeless drug addict, Jerry (Jim Caviezel),
who is taken home by Trevor. We sense that Jerry is only interested in
his next fix, which he is, but he also claims that this kid has helped
him to see the light and get another chance at life. There is the
homeless alcoholic (Angie Dickinson), her own alcoholic daughter,
Arlene, Trevor's mother (Helen Hunt), who always keep a bottle stashed
in her washer. There is also another drug addict and a couple of
school bullies. And then there is Mr. Simonet, who has burn scars all
over his body, uses "a lot of big words" and whom Trevor tries to fix
up with his mother, Arlene. Trevor hopes to at least help his mother
and Mr. Simonet, as well as his friend who is beaten up by bullies. He
is trying to pay it forward. Suddenly, a movement is born, or so it
seems.
"Pay it Forward's" structure is all over the place, as it jumps
backwards and forwards in time. We see a reporter (Jay Mohr) at a
crime scene where his car is nearly demolished. A lawyer sees him, and
offers his Jaguar as compensation for the reporter's loss. The lawyer
is paying it forward, and thus begins the reporter's quest to discover
the origins of this movement. "Four Months Earlier" is the title
reminding us of where we are in time yet throughout the film, Jay
Mohr's character seems to occupy the same timeline as Trevor's,
particularly during the genesis of his plan.
Time shifting is not this film's problem. A bigger flaw is the lack of
time spent on this ingenious plan, its pros and cons and so on. Too
much time is devoted to the silly romance between Mr. Simonet and
Trevor's mother to the point of nausea. Helen Hunt is astoundingly
good as the trashy waitress but her alcoholic mood swings seem too
abrupt to really believe, or as abrupt as it should be. She undergoes
such a quick recovery that it hardly seems plausible she was ever an
alcoholic to begin with. Kevin Spacey is adequately restrained as the
scarred Mr. Simonet, and has all the best dialogue scenes. But hardly
much of this matters as much as Trevor's plan of action. We see
samples of it but not enough is balanced with the film's increasingly
tepid romance, not to mention the inclusion of Trevor's own father
(Jon Bon Jovi) who appears and disappears so fast that you'll forget
he ever existed. I would also have liked to have seen more of
Dickinson's character or even Caviezel's!  .
Some have called "Pay it Forward" shamelessly manipulative and overly
sentimental. Some have called it touching. I just found the Spacey and
Hunt characters real and engaging yet they are mostly saddled with
unrealistic dialogue and shameless cliches, and the rest of the
characters are mere stereotypes. The film is strangely watchable but
also devoid of real human emotion, and plus there is a tragic,
unbelievable coda that negates most of the film's two hour running
time. All in all, not terrible but too thin and cliche ridden to
recommend to anyone, let alone three people.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at
jerry@movieluver.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Author
Christopher Null
     The very idea behind Pay It Forward -- that when someone does an
enormous good deed for you should pay it "forward" to three other,
unsuspecting persons -- requires what is described in the film as "an
extreme act of faith in the goodness of people."
     It's safe to say that your enjoyment of the film is bound by this
same rule.  Dyed-in-the-wool film critics like myself have been down
this road once or twice before, and the enormous leap of faith it takes
to convince oneself that, deep down, even "bad" people are good makes me
want to reach for my DVD of A Clockwork Orange.
     In a nutshell, Pay It Forward essentially gives us a new spin on
the age-old pyramid scheme, this time with an altruistic streak.  The
brainchild of young Trevor McKinney (The Sixth Sense's Haley Joel
Osment), the PIF scheme is hatched when his 7th grade Social Studies
teacher Eugene Simonet (Kevin Spacey) challenges the class to come up
with a plan "to change the world."  While it might have been a good idea
to start by trying to fix up his alcoholic, working-two-jobs,
not-quite-a-hussie-but-almost mom (Helen Hunt), Trevor figures he really
can change the world with his plan.
     Trevor launches Pay It Forward with gusto, helping out a homeless
junkie (James Cavaziel), some kid who keeps getting beat up at school,
and even branching into matchmaking as he tries to set up the
burn-scarred and embittered Mr. Simonet with Trevor's trollop of a
mother.
     It's at this point that we begin to wonder: Is Pay It Forward meant
to be a love story?  Well, no.  Actually, it's a full-blown soap opera,
complete with rank alcoholism, spousal and child abuse, drug addiction,
suicide, homelessness, and everything else you get in the genre except a
murderous evil twin.  As you might expect, the picture is positively
drowning in sentiment, to the point where it gets almost sickening.
     The real driver for all this mushiness is that the film is
extremely talky and, for lack of a better word, preachy.  Moments of
greatness are punctuated by one soliloquy after another.  Sadly, this is
a truly excellent story that is told with exceptionally poor ability. 
Set in Vegas, Pay It Forward could easily have had the power of a film
like its brother-in-setting, Leaving Las Vegas, which utilized the harsh
dichotomy between bright, glitzy lights and the baseness of the human
condition perpetually on display there to drive its message home.  But
it doesn't.  Pay It Forward takes the PG-13 way out and muddles itself
as a film for the entire family to watch, to bond over, and to learn a
thing or two about life.
     To its credit, we do learn that thing or two about life from the
strong moral backbone of Pay It Forward, notably the importance of
taking action instead of just talking about doing something good.  As a
message movie, the film is competent, and indeed it probably will play
well to teen audiences if they can sit through all the blah-blah-blah
chattiness.  But really, is it the best idea to give us the one-two
acting punch of both Jon Bon Jovi and Angie Dickenson to drive the point
home?  Even Spacey and Hunt feel like they're trying karmically to
redeem themselves for the misanthropy on display in (the far superior)
American Beauty and As Good As It Gets.  (For which, of course, each won
an Academy Award, respectively.)
     Ultimately, Pay It Forward will be 2000's take on Forrest Gump. 
Like Gump, Forward is utterly manipulative, a
feel-so-good-you-have-to-cry movie that will divide audiences into two
camps: one that is swept away by the earnestness and emotion of the
story, and one that simply can't stand the sappiness.
Director: Mimi Leder
Producer: Peter Abrams, Robert Levy, Steven Reuther
Writer: Leslie Dixon
Starring: Kevin Spacey, Helen Hunt, Haley Joel Osment, Jay Mohr, James
Caviezel, Jon Bon Jovi, Angie Dickenson
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Author
John Sylva
Kevin Spacey, Helen Hunt, and Haley Joel Osment are out to make the world a 
better place-and no, this isn't the sequel to X-Men.  (Of course it 
isn't-Hollywood wouldn't be stupid enough to let Mimi Leder helm a comic book 
flick, only films that would be great if it wasn't for her involvement with 
them!)  This time around, Leder (The Peacemaker, Deep Impact) lends her awful 
directing techniques to Pay it Forward, a film which proposes an idea of the 
same title: Do something for someone else, something they cannot do by 
themselves, and instead of that person paying you back, they pay it forward 
by doing three good things for three other people.
The concept, whose auter is seventh grader Trevor McKinney (Osment), 
intrigues his social studies class as well as his teacher, Eugene (Spacey), 
who, on the first day of school, gives his class the assignment of conceiving 
an idea to change the world.  Trevor carries out the idea of paying it 
forward, his first good deed being that of allowing a homeless heroine addict 
(James Caviezel) into his home, which doesn't go over too well with his 
alcoholic mother Arlene (Hunt). 
For Trevor's second "pay it forward," he decides to try and hook up Eugene 
and his mother, but as Arlene states, "You can't just put two people together 
and make them like each other."  Or can he? The relationship between Eugene 
and Arlene-which at times overwhelms the "pay it forward" concept of the 
film-is consistently poignant and touching, if not predictable.  The climax 
of their complicated relationship is captured in one of the most moving and 
powerful sequences seen in a film this year.
The character of Trevor is never fully realized, thereby resulting in the 
viewer never knowing what makes the creator of "pay it forward" tick or what 
makes him who he is.  The detachment from his mother is obvious and bluntly 
shown, but the origins and history of Arlene's alcoholism are only touched 
upon.  Attempting to justify Arlene's behavior and problems, the film 
introduces his once abusing, claimed sober ex (Jon Bon Jovi), but Jovi's 
restrained presence fails to make ends meet with the subplot.
After appearing in last year's Academy Award Winner for Best Picture, 
American Beauty and this spring's preachy The Big Kahuna, Kevin Spacey takes 
a different approach towards his character in a different kind of film, 
showing a different side to his two-time Academy Award winning acting skills. 
 Spacey's multi-layered performance is effective and commanding, resulting in 
yet another praise-worthy performance.
One of 1999's greatest success stories, Haley Joel Osment (who received an 
Oscar nomination for his supporting role in The Sixth Sense), makes what he 
can with his character's limited dimensions, and provides quite a bit of 
comic relief while attempting to set up Eugene and Arlene.
Helen Hunt's follow up to her Oscar-winning performance in 1997's As Good As 
It Gets strengthens my belief that she will become the next big thing in 
Hollywood.  Her work in Pay it Forward is undoubtedly the strongest aspect of 
the film, taking a character that could have been an obnoxious stereotype (an 
alcoholic working two jobs to pay the bills), and turning her into a 
fully-developed, strong individual who the viewer grows to appreciate and 
sympathize with. 
Compelling performances and moments of poignancy are undermined by nonsense 
plot devices and a parallel story that runs throughout the film, which 
involves Chris Chandler (the horrid Jay Mohr), who, after receiving a brand 
new Jaguar from a total stranger and being told to just "pay it forward," 
goes on a cross-country search of the originator of the concept.  Constantly 
cutting between this and the Trevor/Arlene/Eugene story, Pay it Forward tries 
to pack too much into one film.  The ambitions of Leslie Dixon's screenplay 
are obvious with the reporter subplot-to show how one idea can spread across 
a great distance-but as the film continuously traces certain people who have 
been affected by "pay it forward," the term and idea become overused.
Leder sets up Pay it Forward like a two hour advertisement directed at the 
Academy, pacing scenes and subplots as if the film's sole purpose is to 
receive Academy Award nominations.  Throughout the film, scenes might as well 
have a flashing subtitle stating "OSCAR CLIP," but come this February, when 
the nominees are announced, Leder should find herself sorely disappointed.
Aside from Leder's direction, all technical aspects of the film are superb: 
Thomas Newton's bouncy and fun musical score adds liveliness to the film and 
Oliver Stapleton's cinematography captures the diverse settings of Las Vegas, 
ranging from bright and shining casinos to the squalor of the homeless.
All of the happenings in Pay it Forward build up to a climax which rides a 
fine line of being tragic and being manipulative, but because the film does 
not dwell on its final twist, its damage done to the film is minimal.  
Although, a brief note to Leder and Hollywood both: I am perfectly capable of 
feeling emotion without the aid of hokey and overly-sappy songs.
The Bottom Line: Despite numerous flaws, the awkward Pay it Forward is a film 
that deserves to be seen, if only for its three central performances.

Author
Faust667@aol.com
You have heard the concept before. You receive an e-mail or a letter in the 
mail regarding a great new opportunity - you send one dollar to seven 
addresses and they will send one dollar to seven others, and so on. Before 
you know it, you will make thousands of dollars a month. The idea forms a 
chain or a pyramid strategy, hence, chain letters. The reason the idea does 
not work is because it feels like a rip-off, plus whose to say that people 
will follow through and pay it forward. The film "Pay it Forward" wants us to 
believe that people repaying acts of kindness for kindness done upon them can 
work if a kid makes them believe in the idea. But how many people are 
genuinely kind enough to follow through with such a plan? Do we want to be 
forced to act kindly? 
Consider the opening sequence of the film set in an elementary school. Trevor 
McKinney (Haley Joel Osment), a seventh grader, listens attentively in class 
as his social-studies teacher, Mr. Simonet (Kevin Spacey), gives an 
extra-credit assignment for the semester. The class is to come up with a plan 
of action to make the world a better place and follow through by performing 
said action. Trevor devises an original plan: one person does an act of 
kindness for someone and that person will pay it forward by helping three 
other people. A chain reaction is expected as numbers will grow and before 
you know it, the world will be at peace again. But there are flaws with such 
a plan, aren't there? Could such a chain reaction occur with no money 
involved? There may be benefits if the acts are reciprocated but what if they 
aren't? This movie never dares to consider that certain people do not want to 
be helped or even want to act kindly. 
For example, there is the homeless drug addict, Jerry (Jim Caviezel), who is 
taken home by Trevor. We sense that Jerry is only interested in his next fix, 
which he is, but he also claims that this kid has helped him to see the light 
and get another chance at life. There is the homeless alcoholic (Angie 
Dickinson), her own alcoholic daughter, Arlene, Trevor's mother (Helen Hunt), 
who always keep a bottle stashed in her washer. There is also another drug 
addict and a couple of school bullies. And then there is Mr. Simonet, who has 
burn scars all over his body, uses "a lot of big words" and whom Trevor tries 
to fix up with his mother, Arlene. Trevor hopes to at least help his mother 
and Mr. Simonet, as well as his friend who is beaten up by bullies. He is 
trying to pay it forward. Suddenly, a movement is born, or so it seems. 
"Pay it Forward's" structure is all over the place, as it jumps backwards and 
forwards in time. We see a reporter (Jay Mohr) at a crime scene where his car 
is nearly demolished. A lawyer sees him, and offers his Jaguar as 
compensation for the reporter's loss. The lawyer is paying it forward, and 
thus begins the reporter's quest to discover the origins of this movement. 
"Four Months Earlier" is the title reminding us of where we are in time yet 
throughout the film, Jay Mohr's character seems to occupy the same timeline 
as Trevor's, particularly during the genesis of his plan. 
Time shifting is not this film's problem. A bigger flaw is the lack of time 
spent on this ingenious plan, its pros and cons and so on. Too much time is 
devoted to the silly romance between Mr. Simonet and Trevor's mother to the 
point of nausea. Helen Hunt is astoundingly good as the trashy waitress but 
her alcoholic mood swings seem  too abrupt to really believe, or as abrupt as 
it should be. She undergoes such a quick recovery that it hardly seems 
plausible she was ever an alcoholic to begin with. Kevin Spacey is adequately 
restrained as the scarred Mr. Simonet, and has all the best dialogue scenes. 
But hardly much of this matters as much as Trevor's plan of action. We see 
samples of it but not enough is balanced with the film's increasingly tepid 
romance, not to mention the inclusion of Trevor's own father (Jon Bon Jovi) 
who appears and disappears so fast that you'll forget he ever existed. I 
would also have liked to have seen more of Dickinson's character or even 
Caviezel's.
Some have called "Pay it Forward" shamelessly manipulative and overly 
sentimental. Some have called it touching. I just found the Spacey and Hunt 
characters real and engaging yet they are mostly saddled with unrealistic 
dialogue and shameless cliches, and the rest of the characters are mere 
stereotypes. The film is strangely watchable but also devoid of real human 
emotion, and plus there is a tragic, unbelievable coda that negates most of 
the film's two hour running time. All in all, not terrible but too thin and 
cliche ridden to recommend to anyone, let alone three people. 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at 
Faust667@aol.com or at jerry@movieluver.com

Author
Mark R. Leeper
     A reporter's car is destroyed while he is getting a story on a
hostage crisis.  As he sadly looks at the wreckage a passing
stranger throws him some car keys, making him the gift of a new
Jaguar.  But the benefactor has one condition.  The reporter must do
large favors for each of three deserving people of his own choice.
And each of them must do three favors.  Intrigued, the reporter sets
out to find the origins of this benevolent pyramid scheme.
     Flash back four months.  In a Las Vegas junior high school, a
new teacher, Mr. Simonet (played by Kevin Spacey) gives his seventh
grade social studies class two tough assignments.  The first is just
to keep up with all the new vocabulary words he uses in his
conversation.  Not easy, but the second assignment is a lot harder.
"Think of an idea that could change the world."  Not an assignment
frequently given to a junior high student.  (At least not until high
school teachers see PAY IT FORWARD.)  Trevor McKinney (Haley Joel
Osment) comes up with a plan more powerful than he realizes.  He
will do favors for three people, each of whom will pass the favor on
threefold in an ever growing pyramid.  Rather than paying back the
favor they pay it forward.  This part of Las Vegas certainly is a
community that could use some altruism.  Trevor's mother Arlene
(Helen Hunt) is a recovering alcoholic who is a waitress in a casino
by day and one in a strip joint by night.  Arlene is infuriated when
Trevor gives a homeless man the run of her house, and she goes to
complain to Mr. Simonet.
     There are several ways this story could have gone wrong.  The
people could have been instantly transformed by the power of good.
Or everybody in the chain might have their lives dramatically
changed by the scheme.  Or the people might not be properly
developed or only developed as one might expect for a film aimed at
teens.  In fact these are people who have had some hellish
experiences and whose lives are not working out.  The script could
have pulled its punches in many different ways.  The way that story
does go wrong was in a much less offensive manner, thought wrong it
does go at the very end.  The filmmakers turn the heretofore
realistic plotline into a slightly syrupy allegory toward the end.
To that point they go out of their way to take a story that was not
pat, and then they give it a pat ending.  But then director Mimi
Leder has had previous problems with the final reel of otherwise
good movies.  That was her problem with the film DEEP IMPACT.  This
screenplay was written by Leslie Dixon who wrote OVERBOARD and MRS.
DOUBTFIRE. The writing is frequently moving and at times takes
chances.  I could probably have done without the love story.  But
for the ending and perhaps some gratuitous violence at the beginning
the writing is good.
     The plotting has been compared with what one might have gotten
in a Frank Capra film and it is an apt analogy, though this
screenplay has some harrowing realism, perhaps along the lines of
LEAVING LAS VEGAS.  Speaking of Las Vegas, when this film about a
pyramid scheme shows the skyline of that city, it features the Luxor
pyramid.  Was it an intentional comment?  Other writers have tried
to do films in the Capra style.  Notable particularly is THE
HUDSUCKER PROXY by the Coen Brothers.  This is a more successful
attempt.
     Helen Hunt seems to be showing up everywhere on the screen
these days.  She is in both PAY IT FORWARD and DR. T AND THE WOMEN,
both currently playing in theaters.  If that were not enough
theaters are showing a trailer for WHAT WOMEN WANT starring Helen
Hunt.  Haley Joel Osment, formerly of THE SIXTH SENSE, seems to have
been born with a face that just seems earnest and intense.  But
whatever part luck played, he is already a skillful actor who holds
his own against adults, not with Shirley Temple cuteness, but with
genuine acting intelligence.  Kevin Spacey also exhibits acting
intelligence, but then he is all grown up so it not quite the same
feat.  All three play scarred people, though Spacey's character's
scars are the most obvious.
     This is a good film worth seeing as I think the other half
dozen or so people who saw it in the theater with me would agree.
It is a pity it is not getting larger audiences.  Perhaps people are
underestimating the maturity of the storytelling.  I rate it a 7 on
the 0 to 10 scale and a low +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     A comment for people who have seen the film:  The chronology
does not quite work in this film.  The birthday party is maybe one
day before the end of the film, but the invitation to the birthday
party happened before the whole parallel sequence.  Simply too much
had to have happened in that interval of time.

Author
Scott Renshaw
PAY IT FORWARD
(Warner Bros.)
Starring:  Kevin Spacey, Helen Hunt, Haley Joel Osment, Jay Mohr, James
Caviezel, Jon Bon Jovi, Angie Dickinson.
Screenplay:  Leslie Dixon, based on the novel by Catherine Ryan Hyde.
Producers:  Peter Abrams, Robert Levy and Steven Reuther.
Director:  Mimi Leder.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (profanity, adult themes, drug use, violence)
Running Time:  122 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     When I finished reading Catherine Ryan Hyde's novel PAY IT FORWARD,
one simple thought occurred to me: "Someone's going to have to screw up
big time to keep this from being a real crowd-pleaser." It was far from
clear that PAY IT FORWARD would make for a great film; there were a lot of
plot threads to condense, and a definite danger of Pollyanna overkill. But
there was something primally satisfying about the whole idea of it, and a
kicker of a finale that was a true tear-jerker on the page. Great, not
necessarily; hanky-wringing and applause-inducing, most definitely.
     Maybe a fable like PAY IT FORWARD could only have worked on the
page. More likely, maybe it only could have worked with a director who
knew how to tell an inherently emotional story with some degree of
subtlety. Mimi Leder utterly botches this tale of a middle school student
named Trevor McKinney (Haley Joel Osment) inspired by his social studies
teacher Eugene Simonet (Kevin Spacey) to develop a unique plan of 
altruism. Trevor devises a sort of human chain letter of good deeds: He
will help three people with something big, then request that his
beneficiaries in turn "pay it forward" to three more people each. His
classmates scoff at his optimism, but Eugene is intrigued by Trevor's
idea. He also finds himself a part of the plan when he becomes one of
Trevor's good deeds, as Trevor attempts to fix him up with his alcoholic
mother Arlene (Helen Hunt).
     Much has been made of the fact that the Kevin Spacey character was
African-American in the novel, but PAY IT FORWARD isn't ineffective
because it's not faithful enough. Indeed, screenwriter Leslie Dixon comes
up with an effective alternative back story for the scars Eugene bears,
and she creatively weaves the sub-plot involving a reporter (Jay Mohr) 
chasing down the origin of the Pay It Forward "movement" into the main
plot. There are quite a few things to like about the film, from Helen 
Hunt's willingness to look positively ghastly, to the use of the Las Vegas
setting. And of course there's Kevin Spacey, who can always be counted on
to dazzle even when the material is less than stellar. He's a fascinating
screen performer, and here he gets at the hope buried in a bitter man.
     That's what Spacey can do even when a director seems to be working
against him. Leder excelled as a small screen director for "E.R.," but in
PAY IT FORWARD, as in DEEP IMPACT, she once again misses every opportunity
to make the film about more than its concept. Granted, Dixon's script is
better with individual moments than it is at building a narrative, but
Leder makes a flawed script even worse. Every shot involving a human face
involves a close-up so intense you can count pores; supporting characters
-- notably Jon Bon Jovi as Trevor's absentee dad -- aren't given a chance
to develop beyond a single note. Her biggest blunders are saved for one of
PAY IT FORWARD's most intense scenes, in which Eugene bares his soul to
Arlene regarding his own past. Leder's editing choices rob the moment of
all its power, including pointless cutaway's to Hunt's reaction shots. 
Every time a scene calls for finding a core of emotional honesty, Leder
opts instead to convey sincerity by blowing up Haley Joel Osment's
head to the size of a dirigible and letting the tears roll down his
pouting face.
     Plenty of opponents of PAY IT FORWARD will probably fixate on the
film's final shot, which borrows blatantly from another feel-good film
that shall remain nameless. Once again, the problem isn't that it differs
from the novel's climax; it isn't even that it's familiar from another
film. The problem is that it's simply a movie moment, one that ignores
that the payoff in PAY IT FORWARD should be the success or failure of
Trevor's idea. It's manipulative and overwrought, but the real issue is
that it's not organic to the story. Leder spends two hours grasping for
how to tell this story visually, and almost never comes up with the
appropriate choice. PAY IT FORWARD is still bound to leave some viewers
thinking they've seen a good film, just because it leaves them a little
teary-eyed. I doubt many of them will feel any resonance from those tears
24 hours later. Congratulations, Mimi Leder, with assistance from Leslie
Dixon. You managed to screw it up big time.

Author
Ron Small
Starring: Kevin Spacey, Helen Hunt, Haley Joel Osmet, Angie Dickinson, James 
Caviezel, Jay Mohr, Jon Bon Jovi, David Ramsey, Gary Werntz
When critics attack seemingly well-intentioned films like PATCH ADAMS or more 
recently PAY IT FORWARD as I am about to do, their opinions are often greeted 
with a backlash of angry e-mails, sometimes even mock death threats from 
those who (I suppose) like to be shamelessly manipulated by their 
entertainment. Even politicians (!) tend to dismiss film critics as heartless 
cynics for occasionally dumping on good-hearted films while praising "filth" 
like PULP FICTION. These [fill in the derogatory term that you are 
comfortable with] tend to forget that a film critic's job is to review the 
movie, not the message, however sweet and endearing that message may be. 
Thusly PATCH ADAMS isn't a bad film because it's about a doctor who cares for 
his patients; it's a bad film because it's a calculated piece of brazen 
audience exploitation. Similarly while PAY IT FORWARD may have its heart in 
the right place (though I even doubt that, stay tuned, an explanation is 
forthcoming), it's still an unpleasantly maudlin mess.
The picture is about an emotionally guarded 5th grade history teacher (a 
somewhat similarly guarded Kevin Spacey), with a burn scared face and equally 
singed attitude, who gives his class the seemingly impossible assignment of 
doing one thing over the course of the semester that will change the world. 
12 year old Trevor (Haley Joel Osmet), a Disneyfied do gooder who takes care 
of his alcoholic mother (Helen Hunt), comes up with the notion to PAY IT 
FORWARD; this entails a person doing one good deed (call it an uber favor) 
for three others, then telling them to do the same for three others and 
before long we're all living in a Frank Capra movie. Meanwhile in a parallel 
story, a weasely reporter (Jay Mohr) tracks the "movement" which has 
apparently begun to grow.
PAY IT FORWARD has odd ideas about tone; at certain points it hurls a 
smattering of unnecessary cynicism at us as if that would be the appropriate 
antidote to the unrelenting sappiness at its core. It's as if director Mimi 
Leder didn't have the confidence to make PAY IT FORWARD the way she intended, 
and compromised out of fear that her film wasn't "gutsy" enough to earn the 
acclaim it has clearly been made for. So the picture adds grit (a child 
molester propositions Trevor, a homeless man returns to heroin after being 
"saved", a character is knifed while doing a good deed, etc) though it seems 
shallow, incorporated into the proceedings because the film itself isn't 
quite sure if it's ready to buy into its own utopian blather.
PAY IT FORWARD offers "crowd pleasing" elements for general audiences; Jay 
Mohr's umpteenth variation on the WASPy sleazeball, Angie Dickinson's earthy 
alcoholic bag woman, and the jive-talking "black hoodlum with a heart of 
gold" (coming on the heals of the black, god-like inmate embodied by Gabriel 
Casseus in BEDAZZLED, this may just be the beginnings of a brand new guilty 
white liberal cliché. Hurray for Hollywood) who actually calls the Mohr 
character a "nigga" and says things like "can you feel me?" Leave it to PAY 
IT FORWARD to happily include a little minstrel act for our further 
enjoyment. (Maybe Spike's flick wasn't so misguided after all). These scenes 
feel as if they belong in a dopey comedy with feel good aspirations rather 
than the irritatingly saccharine drama that you'll find yourself trapped in 
should you not heed my warnings.
While the filmmakers have stressed in interviews that they actually hope 
this is a film that could make the world a better place, to me the final 
product has the oily feel of a cynical politician contemptuously reciting 
cookie fortune slogans to a hopeful audience. It's a picture that looks to be 
tailor made for Academy consideration, with the main players (all previous 
Oscar winners or nominees) given big emotional scenes that are practically 
variations on their most lauded turns. One scene in which a slightly 
de-glamed Helen Hunt (de-glamed here means that not only is she a fashion 
victim [her look is somewhere between Goth queen and trailer park mama], 
Hunt's hair is also natty and badly bleached) verbally castigates Spacey, 
feels right out of her AS GOOD AS IT 
GETS Oscar clip. Spacey, of course, responds in his cultured monotone, that 
could be straight from his low key AMERICAN BEAUTY performance. Maybe the 
actor should get an award for coming off the least self consciously 
irritating; though how can he not, even when he's emoting Spacey seems 
somehow shielded by a wry indifference.
The usually talented Helen Hunt is the worst offender. In one atrocious 
TOUCHED BY AN ANGEL moment Hunt slaps Osmet, immediately covering her mouth 
with the guilty hand in that very same stroke, and with said hand still on 
said mouth, she actually begins convulsing (dry heaving really), then (and 
I'm not making this up) she scurries to the kitchen tearing the place apart 
in a frenzied search for alcohol. The scene is so hokey it could very nearly 
be construed as a parody of hackneyed TV movie blow-ups; it's all very 
theatrical, especially Hunt's performance, which feels like a pathetic plea 
to the Academy for another Oscar. PAY IT FORWARD has the dubious distinction 
of being a film that could be used as an argument for why actors shouldn't 
get Academy Awards. The picture unknowingly affirms that Oscars transform 
nuanced talent into overwrought expressionists.
Even Haley Joel Osemt, the wunderkind who was nominated for an Academy award 
for his unforced performance in SIXTH SENSE, seems more divisive about his 
expressions and inflections. His acting has become broader, less intimate; 
it's as if we can make out the little munchkin's thoughts: "boy this outta 
floor em". Naturally Osmet is made to play one of those only-in-the-movies 
children, a martyr-figure who cleans up after his mother, lectures her on the 
ills of drinking, and even fixes her up on a date with his intellectual 
teacher. Never mind that the two couldn't be more dissimilar; his mother is 
trailer trash dopey, and the teacher is one of those Dennis Miller-ey 
intellectuals who hides his insecurities behind a vast vocabulary. 
Nevertheless this little nudnik goes out of his way to bring the pair 
together in a scene that recalls PARENT TRAP-ish cornball antics. But oh how 
we love bright, articulate, self-sacrificing children who pick adults up by 
their bootstraps and guide them through life. They're so adorable.
Of course the blame can't all be hoisted onto the actors (though with the 
exception of the little kid, they probably should have known better), instead 
the brunt of it should be passed on to Mimi Leder, who directed one of the 
most thrilling episodes of ER, then went on to make two awful genre films in 
a row. The first being THE PEACEMAKER, a witless post-Cold War George Clooney 
vehicle, and DEEP IMPACT, one of the two films of 1998 to squander the 
premise of Earth's possible demise by a crazed meteorite.
The first flick was sunk by an over reliance on clichés, and a complete 
absence of any kind of emotional involvement, not aided by an ending which 
actually centered around the diffusing of a ticking time bomb complete with 
digital read out (apparently present for an invisible audience). DEEP IMPACT 
has more in common with PAY IT FORWARD; it's a movie that treats Earth's 
impending destruction in awfully simplistic terms, completely ignoring the 
havoc that would so obviously take place if the world believed its planet 
would be a goner within days. The film was full of inspirational speeches 
where people really said nothing, though the sappy score swelled up to make 
it appear as if they were being profoundly touching. In PAY IT FORWARD Leder 
continues in this vein with her intermittent dollops of cynicism seeming 
almost like a rebuttal: "See my movie isn't as naďve as you 
might think" she seems to be saying. No, it's just horribly confused.
http://www.geocities.com/incongruity98   Reeling  (Ron Small)

Author
Steve Rhodes
In Mimi Leder's PAY IT FORWARD, seventh grade social studies teacher 
Eugene Simonet throws out his standard challenge to his new students 
("Think of an idea to change our world -- and put it into action.").  
Eugene, a severe-burn victim, is played in another strong performance by 
two-time Academy Award-winner Kevin Spacey (AMERICAN BEAUTY).
Previous classes haven't taken Eugene's change-the-world assignment 
seriously, but this year Trevor McKinney, a latchkey kid, does.  At 11, 
Trevor is one of the smallest and youngest kids in his class.  And with 
AWOL parents, he is wise and serious beyond his years.  As Trevor, Haley 
Joel Osment, Oscar nominee for THE SIXTH SENSE, is amazing again.  This 
role, however, isn't nearly as meaty as his last; so don't expect to see 
any nominations for him this time.
"So you'll like flunk us if we don't change the world?" Trevor demands 
to know in a quizzical panic.  "No, you might just squeak by on a 'C,'" 
Eugene shoots back with a delicate mixture of sweet humor and biting 
sarcasm.
Trevor eventually comes up with an idea along the lines of a Good 
Samaritan chain letter.  His simple plan is that people should do good 
deeds for three other people.  His rules: "#1 it has to be something 
that really helps people, #2 something they can't do by themselves and 
#3 I do it for them, they do it for three other people."  The only 
caveat is that people can't pay it "back."  They can only pay it 
"forward," i.e., they must do something for someone else, not for the 
person who helped them.
Trevor's mother, Arlene (Helen Hunt), is one of the characters in need 
of a lot of help.  She is an admitted alcoholic with an abusive husband 
and a woman whose only friends are other drunks.  Working two jobs and 
drinking heavily when she is home, Arlene is rarely there for her son, 
either physically or emotionally.  One of their mother-son 
confrontations will have parents (and kids) in the audience flinching 
and perhaps even shedding a tear or two.  Arlene's husband, a fellow 
drunk, is currently in one of his long banishment periods.
Both Spacey and Hunt are made to look awful in the service of their 
craft.  Arlene, especially after a long night of boozing, doesn't look 
the least bit like Helen Hunt.  Although Arlene's make-up and clothes 
are convincingly terrible at first, she is spruced up too quickly, as 
if, in some scene left on the cutting room floor, she had a makeover by 
a beauty consultant.  In contrast, as the story advances, Eugene shows 
even more of his deep physical scars.
Jerry (James Caviezel, FREQUENCY), the first person who Trevor tries to 
help, is a street person with a heavy drug habit.  Eugene, Arlene and 
Jerry share several traits.  Eugene hides the story behind his burns.  
Arlene hides her bottles like squirrels do nuts.  And Jerry just hides, 
period, lest Trevor find him shooting up again.  Similarly, Eugene lives 
for the rigidity of his precious schedule.  Arlene lives for her next 
drink.  And Jerry lives for his next fix.  Trevor and his pay-it-forward 
scheme change all of this.
A parallel story, which starts slightly in the future, has a newspaper 
man (Jay Mohr), who is himself befriended by a pay-it-forwarder, 
tracking down the origin of the movement.  Although it is an important 
adhesive for the storyline, this subplot never provides anywhere near 
the emotional or dramatic impact that it could have.  Overall, Leslie 
Dixon's script, based on Catherine Ryan Hyde's novel, is much better 
with the dialog than the narrative.
One of the many sharply written interchanges between Trevor and Eugene 
occurs when Eugene incorrectly thinks that Trevor is questioning his 
sincerity.  "Do I strike you as someone being falsely nice?" Eugene asks 
caustically.  "No, you're not even really nice," Trevor replies with 
bitter honesty.
Although PAY IT FORWARD has more than enough to be able to recommend it, 
it does have two significant problems.  First, major plot twists are 
needlessly telegraphed, destroying what would otherwise have been 
dramatic surprises.  Second, the acting is frequently too subdued, and 
you can almost feel the director throttling back her cast.  Yes, there 
are some definitely saccharine scenes, but many others that should have 
had significant emotional impact come across surprisingly lukewarm.  
This will probably be an unpopular opinion, but PAY IT FORWARD is that 
rare movie that would be more effective if it were schmaltzier.
PAY IT FORWARD runs a bit too long at 2:02.  It is rated PG-13 for 
mature thematic elements including substance abuse/recovery, some sexual 
situations, language and brief violence.  It would probably be too 
strong for most kids under 13.
Email: Steve.Rhodes@InternetReviews.com
Web: http://www.InternetReviews.com

Author
Edward Johnson-Ott
Pay It Forward (2000)
Kevin Spacey, Helen Hunt, Haley Joel Osment, Jay Mohr, James Caviezel,
Jon Bon Jovi, Angie Dickinson, David Ramsey, Gary Werntz. Music by
Thomas Newman. Screenplay by Leslie Dixon, based on the novel by
Catherine Ryan Hyde. Directed by Mimi Leder. 122 minutes.
Rated PG-13, 3 stars (out of five stars)
Review by Ed Johnson-Ott, NUVO Newsweekly
www.nuvo.com
Archive reviews at
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Edward+Johnson-Ott
To receive reviews by e-mail at no charge, send subscription requests to
ejohnsonott@prodigy.net or e-mail ejohnsonott-subscribe@onelist.com with
the word "subscribe" in the subject line.
The central idea of "Pay It Forward" is this: Do something to help three
people. Something hard. Something they could not do for themselves. Then
tell each recipient that, instead of paying you back, he or she should
go out and help three other people. As more and more individuals "pay it
forward," the acts of kindness will build exponentially, creating a more
benign Earth.
It's a wonderful idea, a noble idea; one that I (along with many others,
I suspect) intend to put into practice. Unfortunately, when writer
Catherine Ryan Hyde decided to turn her idea into a book, she apparently
felt our cynical culture would not accept such a sweet concept unless it
was couched in ugliness, pain and sacrifice. So she laid the melodrama
on thick, creating a tearjerker that turned the central character into
the Jesus Christ of New Age spirituality. Her strategy worked and the
novel was a hit. Now comes the movie.
"Pay It Forward," the film, has the best of intentions. The cast is
outstanding and the production contains quite a few effective sequences.
But the movie suffers from Mimi Leder's ham-handed direction, a script
that takes the novel's disparate subplots and ties them into a too-tidy
bow, and a climactic visual shamelessly ripped-off from "Field of
Dreams."
The main story follows seventh-grader Trevor McKinney (Haley Joel
Osment), a latch-key kid living in a run-down Las Vegas neighborhood
with his mother, Arlene (Helen Hunt), an alcoholic working two jobs to
support the family. At the beginning of the school year, Trevor's new
social studies teacher, Eugene Simonet (Kevin Spacey), presents the
class with an extra-credit challenge: "Think of an idea to change our
world  and put it into action."
Trevor takes the assignment seriously and comes up with the pay it
forward concept. To test his theory, he offers shelter and some money to
Jerry (James Caviezel), a homeless drug addict. When a startled Arlene
encounters Trevor's new friend, she storms to the school, furious that a
teacher would give her child such a dangerous assignment. There she
meets the utterly mystified Simonet, a fastidious, well-spoken creature
of habit with a badly scarred face and a guarded demeanor. Thus begins a
tentative relationship between the two damaged souls, with Trevor paying
it forward by playing matchmaker.
The primary storyline is interwoven with a subplot that begins several
months later in Los Angeles, when reporter Chris Chandler (Jay Mohr) is
the recipient of a lavish gift from a stranger on a rainy night.
Pursuing his benefactor, Chandler learns about the pay it forward idea
and decides to trace it back to its origin. A series of vignettes
follow, as the investigation gradually leads the writer to Trevor.
Moving the setting of the story from the heartland to Las Vegas was
inspired. Where most films focus solely on the glitz of the city's
casinos, "Pay It Forward" presents Las Vegas from the residents' point
of view, accenting the gulf between working-class folk and the flashy
opulence of the buildings that glow in the distance.
Hiring Kevin Spacey, Helen Hunt and Haley Joel Osment was another wise
decision. Spacey continues his career path from character actor to
mainstream leading man with another carefully etched performance. Hunt
also creates a rich, well-drawn character and young Osment is as
impressive here as he was in "The Sixth Sense."
Most of the supporting cast must deal with underwritten parts. Angie
Dickinson does good work as a bag lady and Jim Caviezel touches the
heartstrings as the desperate Jerry, although his doe eyes are played up
more than is necessary. In the reporter role, Jay Mohr is serviceable,
as is Jon Bon Jovi in a brief appearance as Trevor's wayward father.
Other aspects of the production are less successful. Thomas Newman's
otherworldly score is overly reminiscent of his haunting "American
Beauty" soundtrack. Continuity problems abound courtesy of the makeup
department. Maybe it's the lighting, but Simonet's facial scars appear
to change from scene to scene. The same happens with Jerry's teeth,
which appear to grow markedly nastier whenever he delivers an
angst-filled speech.
But the biggest problems lie in the screenplay and direction. The
teacher in the book received his wounds during the Vietnam War. The
source of Simonet's injuries (which I won't reveal here) is different,
concocted by scriptwriter Leslie Dixon as part of a needless and
unwelcome attempt to connect two storylines with an extra level of pain.
Her efforts to tidy up the book (watch as a hitchhiking Jerry hops out
of a truck and walks onto a bridge, where he immediately encounters a
woman preparing to jump) only manage to make the proceedings seem
contrived.
As for Mimi Leder, the director needs to take a remedial course in
camera work. Beyond a criminal overuse of close-ups, she repeatedly aims
her lens at the wrong places. The most egregious offense occurs during a
sex scene, when the extremely self-conscious Simonet finally lets down
his guard with another person. Leder foolishly elects to show the
teacher opening his shirt to reveal his scarred torso. Instead of being
entranced by the intimacy between Simonet and his partner, we end up
studying the makeup crew's handiwork.
And then there's the ending of the film, which you will find either
deeply moving or totally unnecessary. Whether you leave the theater
sniffling or angry, I hope you remember that, regardless of its many
problems, "Pay It Forward" puts forth an idea that actually could alter
this planet. If enough of us are as dedicated and industrious as Trevor,
we can take this overwrought, cumbersome fiction and create a better
reality.

Author
Chad Polenz
The concept of "Pay It Forward" is a simple plan developed by a 12-year-old 
boy to change the world. You'd think that would be more than enough plot for 
a major motion picture to work with wouldn't you? Imagine the possibilities 
of a movie showing how performing random acts of kindness could better the 
world - in the right hands it could be pretty powerful. Unfortunately this 
story was trusted with the wrong people who opt to make a sappy tearjerker 
instead of a poignant message. 
This movie wins the First Annual "'American Beauty' Award for How Many 
Over-the-top plot points, characteristics and trite scenes you can Put in One 
Movie And Still Try to Market It As a Thematic Drama." 
Okay, that was kind of a mouthful, but I'll elaborate. "Pay It Forward" is 
about a young boy named Trevor McKinney living in a trailer park in the hills 
overlooking Las Vegas with his recovering alcoholic mother Arlene. Trevor is 
an over-achiever who takes everything literally and is easily discouraged 
when he fails or when things go wrong. He attends a blue-collar middle school 
somewhere in the outskirts of the city where even 7th graders are subject 
to metal detectors at the doors because some are as violent as adult gang 
members. 
One of the main influences in Trevor's life is Mr. Eugene Simonet, a slightly 
arrogant social studies teacher whose face is disfigured by burns. Simonet 
gives his class an assignment to think of an idea that could change the 
world. He does actually expect them to do it, he just wants to see them put 
in the effort. Trevor comes up with the idea of "pay it forward" in which he 
must help three people out in pretty big ways (something they couldn't have 
done without his help) and in turn they must pay the favor forward to three 
other people instead of just doing something nice for him. 
"Pay it forward" is a great idea and one that could easily be put into 
practice in the real world if people were willing to give it a chance and 
swallow their pride. Why do we as humans think of personally helping the less 
fortunate as a humbling and embarrassing duty? It's one thing to write a 
check to charity, it's a much different thing to volunteer your time and 
actually perform labor in the name of kindness and goodwill. But this 
Hollywood we're talking about, the only way the filmmakers think they could 
turn this idea into a good movie is by going the melodramatic route. They'd 
rather appeal to our emotions instead of taking the idea seriously and making 
us think. 
Trevor starts out by bringing a bum home and allowing him to sleep in the 
garage until his mother finds out and nearly blows the bum's head off. She 
then proceeds to rip Mr. Simonet a new one when she finds out where Trevor 
got the idea. When you have a man and a woman who both have severe personal 
problems and meet in an awkward setting and immediately disagree it's clear 
they're going to fall head over heals for each other. I don't think that's 
too much a spoiler because this movie is just that predictable and sappy. 
When we meet Arlene she's an unlikable character not only because of her 
personal demons with alcohol but she's just a bad mother. She's trying to 
protect Trevor from the cruelty of the real world but she's in total denial. 
She works as a part-time burlesque waitress and a part-time casino clerk 
always staying late and coming in early to work if she can get the time. 
We're told she's been known to just jump into bed with men and that she spent 
years with an abusive alcoholic husband. She can't understand why Trevor 
doesn't respect her much less like her (gee, I wonder why?). There's a scenes 
where the two argue and Arlene slaps Trevor and then feels guilty and shocked 
she did it. I can't believe the filmmakers try to pull this one over us. An 
alcoholic floozy mother who DOESN'T beat her kid is a lot more surprising to 
me. 
The story is slowly-paced and the screenplay jumps all over the place between 
Trevor's relationship with his mother and her relationship with Mr. Simonet. 
At the same time there's a sub-plot involving a Los Angeles-based reporter 
who catches wind of "pay it forward" and tracks its roots all the way back to 
Trevor. There's a scene where the reporter interviews a convict who says the 
idea gave him all this clarity like a religious awakening. Uh huh. Anyone can 
just SAY they're a changed person, the film fails to fully detail this. The 
man let a girl go ahead of him in the emergency room but you still never 
believe he's about to become the next Mother Theresa of the ghetto as he 
claims he would be. 
After the halfway point of the film the "pay it forward" concept is 
essentially gone and instead the film is a laboring melodrama of conflicts 
between the characters, most of which are blown out of proportion. Eugene and 
Arlene start dating but don't have much chemistry. I guess we're supposed to 
simply assume that they're lonely and are together because they sympathize 
with each other, not so because they genuinely like each other. A few more 
conflicts arise such as when Trevor tries to run away from home and when his 
father returns after a long asbsence, claims he's sober, and Eugene flips 
out. 
There have been quite a few dramas about alcoholism in families and how it's 
cyclical and genetic. "Pay It Forward" uses that concept for its drama but 
takes it rather lightly. There's a few scenes of screaming and yelling 
between the characters about how screwed up their lives are but after they're 
done nothing has really changed. 
This film was directed by Mimi Leder who also directed "Deep Impact," one of 
the most unapologetic tearjerkers of our time. I didn't think the level of 
pandering and sappiness in that movie could ever be topped but I 
underestimated Leder. Maybe it's not her fault for how ridiculously 
over-the-top the ending to this movie is, but I'd like to think one of the 
producers might have suggested a better way to end it. For all its 
philosophies and ideas about goodness and kindness in the world "Pay It 
Forward" can't come up with a single positive and realistic illustration of 
its themes and instead cops out by trying to send you home weeping. 
I don't think "Pay It Forward" is going to be a hit. I think people are going 
to see right through it. I hate to stomp on a movie but at the end of this 
one so many people in the cinema were making that "tsk" sound it was like 
being in the cricket house at the zoo. 

*****
Chad'z Movie Page is back! 
In-depth reviews of nearly all mainstream films playing at your local 
cineplex. There's also reviews of a few classic films and some of your 
personal favorites.

Author
John Popick
What do an alcoholic titty-bar waitress, an obsessive-compulsive 7th
grade teacher and a kid with beady little eyes and giant teeth have to
do with each other?  You can find out in Pay it Forward, a
button-pushing film with terrific acting, an interesting story and a
really hokey ending.
Forward begins with a Los Angeles news reporter named Chris Chandler
(Jay Mohr, Action) getting his classic car ruined during a hostage
situation.  While he stares in disbelief at the twisted pile of metal, a
complete stranger offers Chandler a brand-new Jaguar.  Shocked beyond
belief, Chandler asks the stranger if any strings are attached to the
generous, out-of-the-blue offer, to which the stranger replies, `Pay it
forward.'  The understandably curious reporter then launches an
investigation into the situation.
Flash to four months earlier, where 11-year-old Trevor McKinney (Haley
Joel Osment, The Sixth Sense) is beginning his first year at a Las Vegas
middle school.  His social studies teacher, Mr. Eugene Simonet (Kevin
Spacey, The Big Kahuna), gives Trevor and his class an abstract
extra-credit assignment by telling them to `think of an idea to change
our world and put it into action.'
The strong-minded Trevor immediately begins to work on the project,
coming up with a rather simple, inventive idea of thinking globally but
acting locally.  His plan - dubbed `paying it back' - has three steps
(like The Tao of Steve) that basically calls for everybody to help three
other people in unique ways.  In turn, these people will help three more
people, who will help three more people, and so on and so forth, until
the whole world becomes one cosmic pyramid scheme of do-gooders.
The main problem with Forward is that Trevor concocts this idea within
the first 30 minutes of the film, so you know that Chandler will
eventually trace `pay it forward' back to Trevor before the credits
start to roll.  The remaining ninety-plus-minutes are rather
predictable, save a couple of minor twists at the end.  But it's still
fun to watch Trevor's plan take root, especially when it shows you can
go from providing a bowl of cereal to giving away a luxury vehicle in
just five simple steps.
After Trevor's first attempt to help a homeless man (James Caviezel,
Frequency), he sets his sights on Mr. Simonet, a slightly disfigured
burn victim who doesn't appear to have had a date since the Carter
administration.  Trevor tries to fix his unsuspecting teacher up with
his mother, Arlene (Helen Hunt, As Good As it Gets), a boozehound with
half-empty bottles stashed all over the house.  At first, it seems like
all of Trevor's attempts at helping others fail miserably, but the
presence of the Chandler sub-plot reminds us that at least one must have
been successful.
It's interesting to watch people get suspicious and angrily shout, `I
didn't ask for your help,' when strangers offer to go out on a limb.
Forward also shows people `paying it forward' on a broader level through
corrective parenting.
If you think it sounds schmaltzy, just wait until the ending, which
drives its point home with the weepy Jane Siberry song "Calling All
Angels."  It's calculating beyond comprehension.  Forward has other
problems, too.  The sole black character is a convicted thief, while the
only two Latinos are knife-wielding pre-teens.  Jon Bon Jovi (U-571),
who plays Trevor's deadbeat dad, looks strangely effeminate and could
probably pass for a transvestite on the right street corner.
There's also a big stumbling block with the Chris Chandler thread of the
story.  Why does he start tracing the origins of `pay it forward'?  It's
just dumb luck that he catches the thing while its only five steps
removed from the source.  He could have been hundreds of participants
away, and his search could have taken years.  Forward's time
manipulation is a little shaky as well.  Chandler's story begins four
months after Trevor launches `pay it forward,' but by the last reel, the
past has somehow caught up with the present.
Forward was directed by Mimi Leder, who is probably best known for
helming action films (like Deep Impact and The Peacemaker) and is a
frequent contributor to the fast-paced ER.  The deliberately slow pacing
of Forward comes as somewhat of a welcome change, as are the close-ups
of Mr. Simonet's scars and Arlene's prematurely aged mug.  The film was
written by Leslie Dixon (The Thomas Crown Affair) and adapted from the
Catherine Ryan Hyde novel.  But don't let the fact that the film was
written and directed by women give you the impression that Forward is a
chick flick.
Oscar-caliber talent can be found behind the camera as well as in front
of it.  Thomas Newman (a nominee for American Beauty) provides the
score, while David Rosenbloom (a nominee for The Insider) serves as the
film's editor. Cinematographer Oliver Stapleton, who was robbed of a
nomination for The Cider House Rules, does a fantastic job of making the
characters seem extremely isolated from the rest of the world,
especially with scenes looking out Mr. Simonet's classroom over the
barren desert and Rocky Mountains.
2:05  PG-13 for adult language and violence
